Arkansas, session 2025, SB534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 56, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 5 — Arkansas Kratom Consumer Protection Act

20-56-501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Kratom
Consumer Protection Act”.

20-56-502. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) On February 1, 2016, the Department of Health added
mitragynine and 7-hydroxymitragynine, which are two (2) constituent compounds
*JMB567*
03/20/2025 12:06:46 PM JMB567

SB534
of the kratom plant, as Schedule I substances;
(2) The Department of Health justified this action on the basis
that mitragynine and 7-hydroxymitragynine induce opioid-like effects when
consumed and included kratom as a Schedule I substance since it has no
approved medical use by the United States Food and Drug Administration;
(3)(A) The United States Food and Drug Administration had
encouraged every state to ban kratom on the premise that it would be
scheduled by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration as a
controlled substance in 2016 and that Alabama, Wisconsin, Indiana, and
Vermont had already classified kratom as a Schedule I substance.
(B) Rhode Island also banned kratom in 2017 based on
information provided by the United State Food and Drug Administration;
(4) On October 13, 2016, the United States Drug Enforcement
Administration withdrew the United States Drug Enforcement Administration’s
scheduling recommendation for kratom, citing insufficient evidence to meet
the requirements for classifying mitragynine and 7-hydroxymitragynine as
Schedule I substances;
(5) On August 16, 2018, the Assistant Secretary of Health of the
United States Department of Health and Human Services withdrew the United
States Food and Drug Administration’s second scheduling recommendation for
mitragynine and 7-hydroxymitragynine as Schedule I substances citing
“disappointingly poor evidence and data and a failure to consider overall
public health”;
(6) On December 1, 2021, the Expert Committee on Drug Dependence
at the United Nations Commission on Narcotic Drugs rejected the
recommendation for international scheduling of mitragynine and 7-
hydroxymitragynine citing insufficient evidence to support that action;
(7) On February 21, 2023, the Indiana House of Representatives,
on a vote of 53-40, passed a repeal of the kratom ban and replaced it with
the Kratom Consumer Protection Act;
(8)(A) On March 1, 2023, the Vermont Department of Health
accepted a petition by the American Kratom Association to remove the kratom
ban.
(B) Upon completion of the planned rulemaking of the
Vermont Department of Health, the number of states with a kratom ban has been
reduced to five (5) states;
03/20/2025 12:06:46 PM JMB567

SB534
(9) On March 10, 2023, the Wisconsin Controlled Substances Board
passed a motion affirming to the Wisconsin State Legislature that kratom does
not meet the statutorily-mandated eight factors established by the Controlled
Substances Act for scheduling despite their view kratom should not be removed
from scheduling until more research is available;
(10) The Rhode Island Legislature is proceeding with the Kratom
Consumer Protection Act after the Interim Director of the Rhode Island
Department of Health acknowledged kratom does not meet the criteria for
scheduling;
(11) At this time, nine (9) states, including Utah, Georgia,
Arizona, Nevada, Oregon, Colorado, Oklahoma, West Virginia, and Virginia,
have passed versions of the Kratom Consumer Protection Act;
(12) On March 16, 2022, United States Department of Health and
Human Services Secretary Becerra, in a letter to Senator Mike Lee and
Representative Mark Pocan, acknowledged “knowledge gaps” on kratom and that
“kratom-involved overdose deaths have occurred after use of adulterated
kratom products or taking kratom with other substances”;
(13) On December 29, 2022, President Joe Biden signed the FY23
Omnibus with kratom report language commending the National Institute on Drug
Abuse for funding studies on kratom that “may provide help for some Americans
struggling with addictions, given its analgesic and less addictive properties
as compared to opioids”;
(14)(A) Data from the Department of Health shows that fatal
opioid overdoses have been on the rise in recent years.
(B) In 2021, the Department of Health reported there were
six hundred twenty-eight (628) drug overdose deaths in Arkansas; and
(15)(A) On May 17, 2022, the Director of the National Institute
on Drug Abuse, Dr. Nora Volkow, testified regarding the drug overdose crisis
at a hearing of the United States Senate Appropriations Subcommittee on
Labor, Health and Human Services, Education, and Related Agencies.
(B) When asked about overdose prevention strategies, Dr.
Volkow stated: “There’s also interest in the community to test other products
that may serve as harm reduction. For example, the use of kratom, which is
sold as tea and that contains a drug molecule that has effects that are
similar to a dose of buprenorphine but could be utilized also for decreasing
withdrawal or depression.”
03/20/2025 12:06:46 PM JMB567

SB534

20-56-503. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Food" means a food, food product, food ingredient, dietary
ingredient, dietary supplement, or beverage for human consumption;
(2)(A) "Kratom product" means a food containing any part of the
leaf of the plant Mitragyna speciosa or an extract of the plant mitragyna
speciosa.
(B) A "kratom product" may be manufactured as a powder,
capsule, pill, beverage, extract, or other edible form;
(3) “Kratom extract” means a food containing any part of the
leaf of the plant Mitragyna speciosa that has been extracted in order to
provide more standardized dosing;
(4) "Processor" means a person who sells, prepares,
manufactures, distributes, or maintains kratom products or advertises,
represents, or holds itself out as selling, preparing, or maintaining kratom
products; and
(5) “Retailer” means a person that sells, distributes,
advertises, represents, or holds itself out as selling or maintaining kratom
products.

20-56-504. Kratom product limitations.
A processor shall not prepare, distribute, sell, or expose for sale any
of the following:
(1) A kratom product that:
(A)(i) Is adulterated with a dangerous non-kratom
substance.
(ii) A kratom product is adulterated with a
dangerous non-kratom substance if the kratom product is mixed or packed with
a non-kratom substance and that substance affects the quality or strength of
the kratom product to such a degree as to render the kratom product injurious
to a consumer;
(B)(i) Is contaminated with a dangerous non-kratom
substance.
(ii) A kratom product is contaminated with a
dangerous non-kratom substance if the kratom product contains a poisonous or
03/20/2025 12:06:46 PM JMB567

SB534
otherwise deleterious non-kratom ingredient, including without limitation the
substances listed in the state’s controlled substances list;
(C) Contains:
(i) A level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid
fraction that is greater than one percent (1%) of the overall alkaloid
composition of the product; or
(ii) Any synthetic alkaloids including synthetic
mitragynine, synthetic 7-hydroxymitragynine, or any other synthetically
derived compounds of the kratom plant;
(2) A kratom extract that contains levels of residual solvents
higher than is allowed in the U.S. Pharmacopeia Chapter 467; or
(3) A kratom product or kratom extract that does not provide
adequate labeling directions necessary for safe use by consumers, including a
recommended serving size, the recommended number of servings per day, and the
number of servings in the package that is sold.

20-56-505. Age limits.
A processor or retailer shall not distribute, sell, or expose for sale
a kratom product to an individual under eighteen (18) years of age.

20-56-506. Processor registration.
(a)(1) A processor shall register annually with the Department of
Agriculture any kratom product or kratom extract intended to be offered for
sale to an end consumer that is in an approved kratom delivery form and pay a
fee that is adjusted annually to cover all administrative costs for
processing and administering the registrations.
(2) The registration shall include a certificate of analysis
from a certified independent third-party laboratory showing compliance with
the requirements for kratom products or kratom extracts in this subchapter.
(b)(1) Upon receipt of a credible report of noncompliance with this
subchapter on a kratom product or kratom extract offered for sale, the
department shall require the processor to produce an updated and current
certificate of analysis in a reasonable time frame from a certified
independent third-party laboratory showing compliance with the requirements
of this subchapter for safe kratom products or kratom extracts.
(2) If the processor does not provide the certificate of
03/20/2025 12:06:46 PM JMB567

SB534
analysis in subdivision (b)(1) of this section in the specified time frame,
the registration for that kratom product or kratom extract shall be revoked.
(c)(1) Upon receipt of any adverse event related to a registered
kratom product or kratom extract, the processor shall submit a copy of the
adverse event report via certified mail to the department that is required to
be submitted to the United States Food and Drug Administration under Section
761 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.
(2) The department may revoke the kratom product’s or kratom
extract's registration for any documented failure to report an adverse event
to the department.
(d)(1) If the department has a reasonable basis to require an
independent third-party test of a registered kratom product or kratom extract
by a laboratory of the department’s choice, the processor shall be required
to submit payment for the test within a reasonable time frame.
(2) If the processor does not tender payment to the department
within a set time period upon receipt of the invoice for the testing, the
department shall revoke the registration for that kratom product or kratom
extract.

20-56-507. Violations.
(a)(1) A processor that violates this subchapter is subject to an
administrative fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for the
first offense and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for a second or
subsequent offense.
(2) Upon the request of a person to whom an administrative fine
is issued, the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture shall conduct a
hearing in accordance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-
15-201 et seq.
(b) A retailer does not violate this subchapter if it is shown by a
preponderance of the evidence that the retailer relied in good faith upon the
representations of a processor of food represented to be a kratom product or
kratom extract.




03/20/2025 12:06:46 PM JMB567